Hawaii, session 2026, SB1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 287-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The traffic and emergency period violations bureaus of the district courts, upon request, shall furnish any person a certified abstract of the bureaus' record, if any, of any person relating to all [alleged moving violations and any convictions resulting therefrom,] moving violations resulting in convictions arising from the operation of a motor vehicle and any administrative license revocation pursuant to chapter 291E, part III and chapter 286, part XIV, as it was in effect on or before December 31, 2001.  The traffic and emergency period violations bureaus may collect a fee, not to exceed $20, of which $18 shall be deposited into the general fund and $2 shall be deposited into the judiciary computer system special fund." SECTION 2. By July 1, 2026, the traffic and emergency period violations bureaus of the district courts shall remove all dismissed moving violations that did not result in a conviction arising from the operation of a motor vehicle from the certified abstract of all persons. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $            or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the traffic and emergency period violations bureaus of the district courts to remove all dismissed moving violations not resulting in convictions from all traffic abstracts. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.